Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Chapter 18

Major Energy Project Act of 1981

13-18-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Major Energy Project Act of 1981.”

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 1.

Cross-References. Major energy projects provisions inapplicable to hazardous waste management, § 68-212-107.

13-18-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly otherwise requires:

“Applicant” means any person planning or proposing a project which has been designated a major energy project;

“Approval” means any permit, license, lease, certificate, right-of-way, or other grant, rate, ruling, or decision authorized or issued by an agency of state or local government;

“Contact agency” means the department of economic and community development;

“Joint review process” means the process provided by §§ 13-18-108 — 13-18-115 by which the applications for permits or approvals required by state, local, or federal agencies for a major energy project are consolidated and coordinated;

“Joint review staff” means those persons from involved agencies who are designated to staff the joint review team;

“Joint review team” or “team” means a coordinating group organized to conduct the joint review process on a major energy project. It is an officially composed group of government agencies organized to work with the applicant to coordinate government review and decision-making activities and is composed of involved state, local, and federal agencies and the applicant;

“Lead local agency” means the local department or agency designated by the chief executive officer of that local government to be most affected by or involved in the proposed major energy project;

“Lead state agency” means the department or agency of the state determined by the governor to be most involved in the joint review process;

“Local government” means any government body, including any municipality, county, or utility district or any political subdivision of this state;

“Local law” means the rules, regulations, resolutions, ordinances, codes, case law, and other laws of any local government;

“Major energy project” means any project at one (1) physical location which has been determined by the contact agency to be in the state interest pursuant to its authority under § 13-18-103, which has a capital cost of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) or more, and which is likely to reduce the dependence of the state on imported energy projects;

“Person” means any individual, cooperative, partnership, corporation, association, consortium, unincorporated organization, trust, estate, nonprofit institution or any entity organized for a common purpose, and any instrumentality of state or local government;

“Project decision schedule” or “schedule” means the timetable set out by the joint review team in which to accomplish the joint review process, submit applications, hold hearings, and obtain approval of involved agencies;

“State agency” means any general or special purpose executive agency of Tennessee;

“State law” means the laws, rules, resolutions and case law of Tennessee; and

“Team leader” means the state or local lead agency which is selected by the joint review team to lead the team and coordinate and supervise the joint review process.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 2.

13-18-103. Applications for designation as major energy project, joint review, and expedited review — Revocation or termination — Judicial review.

Any person planning or proposing an energy project may apply to the contact agency for an order designating such project as a priority energy project. An application shall include such detailed information concerning the project as the contact agency may require by rule to enable the contact agency to make a designation, including a detailed design proposal for the project, detailed economic data on the costs of the project, and an analysis of environmental impacts of the project; provided, that the adequacy of an application under this section shall not be subject to judicial review.

Not later than five (5) days after the receipt of a designation request, the contact agency shall publish notice of the filing of the designation request, together with a brief description thereof in newspapers of general circulation in the area of the project and in Nashville. The contact agency shall also keep on file and make available for public inspection and copying at the main office of the contact agency and in such other places as the contact agency deems appropriate such portions of the full designation request.

No project shall be designated a major energy project unless the contact agency finds that the project is likely to reduce directly or indirectly the state's dependence on imported energy and meets the capital expenditure requirements set out in § 13-18-102(11).

Any person who plans to develop an energy project may request the contact agency to designate the project a major energy project and to approve the project for joint review. The chief executive officer of the contact agency shall determine whether the proposed project is a major energy project and whether it qualifies for the joint review process. The chief executive officer of the contact agency shall consult with agencies who will be involved in issuing permits and with any other agency to determine whether the proposed project should be so designated. If the chief executive officer decides the project should be so designated, the chief executive officer shall recommend the designation to the governor for the governor's concurrence.

If the governor approves designation of the proposed project as a major energy project, the governor shall issue an executive order designating a lead state agency, approving the project for the joint review process, and providing for a joint review staff.

An applicant may request the joint review process for parts of the regulatory as well as for the entire process.

In the alternative, any person who plans to develop an energy project may request the contact agency to designate the project a major energy project and to approve the project for expedited review. In the case of a request for expedited review, the applicant shall indicate which agencies or parts of the regulatory process the applicant wishes to have considered under the terms of this chapter. Expedited review shall enjoy the expedited judicial hearings provided for by this chapter. In the case of a request for expedited review, the chief executive officer shall make the determinations provided for in subsections (a) and (b) and submit such chief executive officer's recommendation to the governor. If the governor approves, the governor has to issue an executive order specifying the agencies or parts of the regulatory process to be included in expedited review and the procedure to be followed.

An applicant may seek to be declared a major energy project and to utilize expedited review solely to enjoy any one (1) of the benefits set out in this chapter, such as expedited judicial review or consolidation of hearings, but such applicant shall be limited to the relief sought.

A request for designation of a project as a major energy project and use of the joint review process, or for expedited review, shall be approved or rejected within one (1) month of the initial request.

Once an energy project has been designated a major energy project, and the joint review process or expedited review process has begun, the designation and process shall not be revoked or terminated unless requested by the applicant or unless procured by fraud or misrepresentation.

A decision of the contact agency or governor designating an energy project as a major energy project shall not be subject to judicial review, except for fraud or misrepresentation and no court shall hold unlawful or set aside any department or agency action, finding, rule, or conclusion on the basis of a decision designating an energy project as a major energy project.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 3.

13-18-104. Joint review team — State lead agency — Local lead agency.

If a project is designated a major energy project and approved for the joint review process, a joint review team shall be formed. The state agencies in the team shall be designated by the governor and shall include all departments or agencies whose approval will be required for any state-issued permit which the project may require. The governor shall designate one (1) agency to be the state lead agency.

In addition to state agencies, the team shall include any local agencies whose approvals may be required in the development of the project. The joint review staff shall be responsible for identifying and contacting each involved local agency. If a local government has more than one (1) involved agency, its chief executive officer shall designate the local lead agency.

In addition to state and local agencies, federal agencies whose approvals may be required in the development of the project shall be invited to join the team. The joint review staff shall be responsible for identifying and contacting each involved local agency.

In addition to all governmental agencies, the team shall include the project applicant as an ex officio member.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 4.

13-18-105. Duty of joining local agency to participate in and abide by joint review process schedule.

If a local agency joins the team, the head of that agency and the chief executive officer of the local government in which the agency is located shall agree to participate in the joint review process and abide by the project decision schedule for all locally required permits, licenses, or other approvals. Such agreement shall not negate the independent authority of the local agency or government to issue its ultimate approval or disapproval, so long as such decision is made in accordance with the project decision schedule.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 5.

13-18-106. Joining federal agency to cooperate and abide by schedule.

If a federal agency joins the team, it shall abide by the project decision schedule and cooperate in the joint review process, insofar as is possible and consistent with federal law.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 6.

13-18-107. Meeting of joint review team — Timing — Notice.

After all involved state, local, and federal agencies have been identified, the joint review staff shall call a meeting of the joint review team.

Such meeting shall be called not more than six (6) weeks after the project is designated a major energy project, and the participants shall be given at least two (2) weeks notice of the meeting. The notice shall include the time, date and place of the meeting, the agenda to be considered, and any additional information needed to inform participants or the public of the purpose of the meeting. The notice shall be advertised in a newspaper of general circulation.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 7.

13-18-108. Selection of team leader — Presentation by applicant — Draft agreement.

At the first meeting, the joint review team shall select a participating agency to be team leader.

The applicant shall make a presentation to the team at this meeting on the project, stating what actions it has already undertaken, what actions will be undertaken in the future, and what actions it would like the team to take.

Based on the information submitted by the applicant to the contact agency, the joint review staff shall submit a draft agreement of responsibilities to the team describing the statutory and regulatory jurisdiction, duties and responsibilities of each permitting and nonpermitting agency at each level of government that may review the proposed project. It shall also describe the responsibilities and general schedule of the applicant.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 8.

13-18-109. Second meeting — Completion of agreement of responsibility.

After the team members have had a reasonable time to review the draft agreement and the applicant's presentation, but not more than four (4) weeks, the team leader shall call a second meeting. At this meeting the team shall complete the agreement of responsibility. When completed it shall be signed by the team members.

Notice of this meeting shall be given in accordance with § 13-18-107.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 9.

13-18-110. Additional meetings.

After the agreement of responsibility has been signed, the team shall hold such additional meetings as it deems necessary to hear public comment, to gather information on the project, and clarify the responsibilities of the team members. At these meetings, the team and the applicant shall also develop a tentative project decision schedule.

At least two (2) of these meetings shall be held in the vicinity of the project site.

Not more than fourteen (14) weeks shall be used to complete this process.

Adequate public notice shall be given prior to each meeting, in accordance with § 13-18-107.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 10.

13-18-111. Consolidation of applications — Project decision schedule.

During the meetings provided for in § 13-18-110, the applicant and the involved agencies shall agree whether or not to attempt a coordination of applications. If possible, the applicant and the team should attempt to agree on one (1) consolidated application designed to satisfy the requirements of all participating agencies without violating administrative and substantive law.

If one (1) consolidated application is not possible, the applicant and the team shall endeavor to consolidate as many different applications as possible into one (1) application. It is expected that all state and local applications will be so consolidated.

When agreement on consolidation of applications has been reached, a project decision schedule shall be adopted to chart the application and approval process. The schedule may subsequently be modified by the team if necessary, but the general time limits agreed on by the applicant and the permitting agencies should be maintained.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 11.

13-18-112. Preapplication meetings — Failure to participate.

Beginning as early in the joint review process as possible, but not less than thirty (30) days prior to application, the applicant and permitting agencies shall hold preapplication meetings to determine what each expects from the other so as to accelerate the application process.

The applicant shall also meet with public individuals and groups who have expressed or have identified interests in the project, either through the medium of the meeting provided for in §§ 13-18-108 — 13-18-110, or otherwise, to identify and deal with the concerns of such persons.

If persons who have had the opportunity to participate in preapplication meetings and raise concerns did not do so, it shall be noted in the application record.

Notice of such meetings shall be given in accordance with § 13-18-107.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 12.

13-18-113. Implementation and compliance with project decision schedule.

When the project decision schedule has been agreed on, the application shall be submitted and actions taken in accordance with it. Each permitting agency and the applicant shall endeavor to comply with the schedule so as to complete the permitting process as expeditiously as possible, with due regard for public health, safety, and welfare, and the rights of the applicant. The team leader shall monitor implementation of the schedule and act to resolve delays or disputes.

No project decision schedule shall encompass a period of more than two (2) years unless the team finds that additional time is necessary.

The time limits for agencies' actions set out in the project decision schedule shall be followed unless the team determines that different deadlines would help expedite or coordinate government review.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the time limits and special procedures imposed by the project decision schedule shall constitute the lawful decision-making deadlines and procedures for reviewing applications filed by the applicant.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 13.

13-18-114. Special procedures for state agencies authorized.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the team may establish special procedures in the project decision schedule for any state agency subject to such schedule.

Such procedures shall be consistent with all statutes and rules, regulations and orders promulgated by the agency except that the team may require the agency to:

Consolidate, to the maximum extent practicable, its proceedings respecting actions and decisions which are subject to the project decision schedule with the proceedings of other agencies, including other state and local agencies which are also subject to such schedule;

Establish permit, license, and other filing requirements which eliminate unnecessary duplication, and, to the maximum extent practicable, provide for uniform collection, analysis, and reporting of such data;

Substitute legislative-type hearings in lieu of trial-type hearings; provided, that in any cases in which:

A formal hearing including an opportunity for cross-examination of witnesses is authorized by any provision of statute other than this chapter; and

The agency determines there is a genuine and substantial dispute of fact which can only be resolved with sufficient accuracy by the introduction of evidence in a formal hearing;

the agency shall designate such dispute for resolution in a formal hearing conducted in accordance with the statute providing for such hearing;

Shorten time periods for actions required by agency procedures;

Conduct hearings, except where such hearings are conducted pursuant to subdivision (b)(3), in which parties may submit such written data, views, or arguments and such written responses to the data, views or arguments submitted by other parties, as the team, agency, or the presiding employee may specify and in which oral presentation is limited to brief oral argument with respect to the written submissions;

Establish procedures for issuing final decisions in which the presiding employee at any hearing may be required to certify the hearing record to the agency for decision without an initial decision. Such procedures may also require the presiding employee to submit the record to the agency without a recommended or tentative decision, but with such analysis of the record as the agency may specify. The agency itself shall then make the decision; or

Utilize any combination of procedures authorized by this subsection (b).

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 14.

13-18-115. Judicial action to enforce schedule.

If any state or local agency has failed or is reasonably likely to fail to comply with a project decision schedule, the team leader may bring an enforcement action in the appropriate chancery court.

In any action brought under this section, if the court determines that any state or local agency has failed or is reasonably likely to fail to comply with a project decision schedule, the court shall order the agency to act in accordance with the existing schedule where such action would be practical and would not deny any person due process of law.

If the court determines that the agency has failed or is reasonably likely to fail to comply with a project decision schedule but that action in accordance with the project decision schedule would clearly be impracticable or would deny any person due process of law, the court shall instruct the team to revise the project decision schedule to require the agency to complete consideration of the applicant's request as soon as practicable, consistent with due process of law. Immediately upon receipt from the team of a certified copy of the revised project decision schedule, the court shall issue an order directing the agency to comply with such schedule.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law including any other provision of this chapter, any action brought under this section shall be assigned for hearing and completed at the earliest possible date, shall, to the greatest extent practicable, take precedence over all other matters pending on the docket of the court at the time, and shall be expedited in every way by such court.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 15.

13-18-116. Consolidated hearings.

If agreed to by the team and the applicant, consolidated hearings shall be used when possible. Such hearings shall include all hearings which agencies would be required to conduct individually. The team and the applicant shall determine which agencies shall be included in the consolidated hearings, but no agency shall be included over the objection of the applicant, if the action required from that agency is merely routine or administrative. If an application by the applicant to a particular agency would not otherwise require a hearing, such agency shall not be included in the consolidated hearing and no action taken in the consolidated hearing shall delay such application.

The consolidated hearing is intended to combine public hearings concerned with similar regulatory topics, e.g., water quality, into one (1) hearing, thus avoiding the need for additional individual hearings. Issues to be considered in the hearing must be common to each agency and clearly indicated in the agenda and public notice. A common hearing procedure must be developed that satisfies due process and individual agency statutes. One (1) hearing record should be prepared for use by each agency.

Procedural and organizational arrangements for the hearing should be made as far in advance as possible. Guidelines for organizing the hearing are provided below:

The team and applicant should identify those public hearings that could be coordinated. If possible, such identification should occur when the project decision schedule is formulated;

The team, in conjunction with the applicant and relevant agencies, should decide whether it is feasible to coordinate those hearings and which coordinated approach would be desirable;

Assuming coordination is feasible, the team leader should appoint one (1) team member to develop a coordinated hearing plan;

The team member assigned to develop the plan will arrange various meetings, as necessary, with relevant agency representatives, their attorneys and the proponent to develop and review proposed plans;

Once a plan has been agreed upon, the decision schedule should be modified, if necessary, to reflect the hearing agreement;

If the participating agencies and the proponent agree, the team member assigned to coordinate development of the joint hearing plan should continue to coordinate implementation of the plan; and

The coordinated hearing plan should be discussed at one (1) or more team meetings to allow for public comment.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 16.

13-18-117. State or local timing provisions modified to coincide with federal law.

To effect maximum consolidation and coordination of the permitting process, any state or local law or regulation on the timing for filing documents, holding hearings, or providing notice is hereby modified to the necessary extent to coincide with the applicable federal law or regulation, if the federal agency involved participates in the joint review process.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 17.

13-18-118. Waiver of state or local law enacted after commencement of construction.

The joint review team is authorized to waive application of any state or local statutes, regulations, or requirements enacted or promulgated after the commencement of construction of a major energy project, unless the general assembly explicitly prohibits such waiver. No waiver pursuant to this section shall take effect unless:

The team finds that the waiver is necessary to ensure timely and cost-effective completion and operation of the facility; and

The team, after consultation with the agency responsible for implementing the statute, regulation, or requirement to be waived, finds that the waiver will not unduly endanger public health or safety.

For the purposes of this section, “commencement of construction” means that the owner or operator of a major energy project has obtained all necessary preconstruction approvals or permits required by state or local laws or regulations and either has:

Begun or caused to begin, a continuous program of physical on-site construction of the facility, including site clearance, grading, dredging, or land filling in preparation for the fabrication, erection, or installation of the building components of the facility; or

Entered into binding agreements or contractual obligations, which cannot be cancelled or modified without substantial loss to the owner or operator, to undertake a program of construction of the facility to be completed within a reasonable time.

For the purpose of this subsection (b), interruptions resulting from acts of God, strikes, litigation, or other matters beyond the control of the owner shall be disregarded in determining whether such construction is continuous.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 18.

13-18-119. Modification of project decision schedule.

At any time prior to the completion of the major energy project, the joint review team may:

Revise the special procedures for state or local agencies on the project decision schedule;

Add new special procedures for state or local agencies on the project decision schedule;

Revise any deadline on the project decision schedule; or

Add any new deadline on the project decision schedule.

No modification in the project decision schedule shall be allowed unless the team determines that:

Such modification would further the purposes of this chapter;

Continued adherence to the schedule would be impractical or would not be in the public interest;

In the case of a request for a modification by an agency, that the agency has exercised due diligence in attempting to comply with the schedule;

In the case of a request for a modification by an applicant, that the applicant has exercised due diligence in attempting to comply with the schedule; and

Except as provided by this section, such modification is consistent with § 13-18-114 and is published in a newspaper of general circulation.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 19.

13-18-120. Certification of approvals — Effect.

If the joint review team has been notified by the agencies with authority to grant such approvals or perform such actions, or by a reviewing court, that all agency actions and approvals on the project decision schedules relating to a priority energy project:

Have been granted;

Have been performed; or

Are not necessary;

and if judicial review of such actions or approvals is completed, then the team shall certify the same. Such certification shall indicate any conditions and the expiration date of any approvals that have been granted to the project.

A certificate issued by the team under subsection (a) shall constitute conclusive evidence in any judicial or executive proceeding that all actions and approvals necessary to the completion and initial operation of the project have been granted for the duration and subject to the conditions specified on the certificate.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 20.

13-18-121. Intervention or appearance in other action.

The joint review team, or the applicant individually, may intervene in any state or local agency proceeding if such agency proceeding involves an action pursuant to this chapter or involving the project.

The joint review team, or the applicant individually, may appear as a party of right in any judicial proceeding involving an action pursuant to this chapter or involving the project.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 21.

13-18-122. Appeals — Consequent revision of project decision schedule.

Any judicial appeal which is provided for in the permitting process of any individual agency shall be permitted when such agency joins in the joint review process, and any action of the joint review team in conducting such process may be appealed if such action by the permitting agency would be appealable.

Unless specified otherwise, appeals shall be made to the chancery court for Davidson County, and shall be given priority by that court and heard before any other action not already under consideration by that court.

Any appeal from a decision of the chancery court shall be made directly to the Tennessee supreme court and be expedited by that court. Any review by the Tennessee supreme court shall be assigned for hearing and completed at the earliest possible date, shall to the greatest extent practicable take precedence over all other matters on the docket of the court at that time, and shall be expedited in every way by such court.

Immediately following any decision remanding to an agency any case or controversy involving the validity of this chapter or an action pursuant to this chapter, the joint review team shall revise the project decision schedule as necessary to expedite any further proceedings required by the decision of the court. Such revisions shall be consistent with § 13-18-119.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 22.

13-18-123. Time limits for petitions for review.

Except as provided by subsection (b), any petition for review of any action pursuant to this chapter or of the validity of this chapter shall be brought not later than twenty (20) days following the date of actual or constructive notice of the final agency action relating to the action which is being challenged.

Any petition for review of the reasonableness of any deadline in a project decision schedule shall be brought not later than thirty (30) days after such deadline is listed on the project decision schedule and published in a newspaper of general circulation or such challenge shall be barred. The party challenging the reasonableness of the deadline shall have the burden of proof.

Any petition for review of the validity of this chapter or of any action pursuant to this chapter shall be barred unless a complaint is filed prior to the expiration of time limits prescribed by subsections (a) and (b).

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 23.

13-18-124. Limitations on injunctive relief not part of final judgment.

Except as provided in subsection (b), no court shall have jurisdiction to grant any injunctive relief lasting longer than ninety (90) days against any act pursuant to this chapter, except in conjunction with the final judgment entered in a case.

No court shall have jurisdiction to grant any injunctive relief preventing the enforcement of a project decision schedule except in conjunction with a final judgment. If the court on review determines that a deadline on a project decision schedule is not reasonable, the court may instruct the board to extend the deadline period.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 24.

13-18-125. Expedited review procedure.

If the applicant seeks an expedited review under § 13-18-103(c), the applicant and the agencies which are involved may utilize any provision of this chapter, including project decision schedules, consolidated hearings, and all provisions for expedited judicial review. When using a procedure, such as a project decision schedule, the applicant and the agency or agencies involved in the expedited review, acting together, are authorized to take any action or do anything that a joint review team may or should do, and for that purpose may act as a joint review team.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 25.

13-18-126. All state entities authorized to provide assistance — Composition of joint review staff — Loans of personnel.

All departments, agencies, or other entities of state government, including the University of Tennessee and institutions operated by the board of regents, are authorized to provide any assistance requested by the joint review team, the team leader, or the contact agency.

The joint review staff may be drawn from any of the preceding entities and personnel shall be placed on loan to the team at the request of the team leader. The loan shall continue for the term of the joint review process, and for a reasonable time thereafter, and during such period the compensation, benefits, and expenses of such loaned employee shall continue to be paid by the employing entity.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 47.

13-18-127. Rules and regulations.

The contact agency or joint review team or team leader is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Rules and regulations procedural in nature only shall not be subject to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Any other rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 46.

13-18-128. Statutory purpose — Liberal construction.

This chapter is declared to be remedial in nature to reduce the reliance of Tennessee on imported energy products, and this chapter shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes and provide for the most rapid development of major energy projects consistent with public health and safety.

Acts 1981, ch. 131, § 45.